Illinois, session 104th, SB2461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Care 5for Retired Police Dogs Program Act. 6    Section 5. General Assembly findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) police dogs are an integral part of many law 9    enforcement and correctional efforts statewide, including 10    the apprehension of suspects through tracking and 11    searching, evidence location, drug and bomb detection, and 12    search and rescue operations;13        (2) law enforcement and correctional agencies agree 14    that the use of police dogs is an extremely cost-effective 15    means of crime control and that police dogs possess skills 16    and abilities that frequently exceed those of existing 17    technology;18        (3) the service of police dogs is often dangerous and 19    can expose them to injury at a rate higher than that of 20    non-service dogs; and21        (4) police dogs provide significant contributions to 22    the residents of this State.    SB2461- 2 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 2    "Correctional agency" means a lawfully established State 3or local public agency having primary responsibility for the 4supervision, protection, care, custody, control, or 5investigation of inmates at a correctional institution.6    "Law enforcement agency" means a lawfully established 7State or local public agency having primary responsibility for 8the prevention and detection of crime or the enforcement of 9penal, traffic, highway, regulatory, gaming, immigration, 10postal, customs, or controlled substances laws.11    "Retired police dog" means a dog that was previously in 12the service of or employed by a law enforcement agency or a 13correctional agency in this State for the principal purpose of 14aiding in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of 15laws, or apprehension of offenders and that received 16certification in obedience and apprehension work from a 17certifying organization, such as the National Police Canine 18Association or a similar certifying organization.19    "Veterinarian" has the same meaning given to that term in 20the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004. 21    "Veterinary care" means the practice, by a veterinarian, 22of veterinary medicine as defined in Section 3 of the 23Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004. The term 24includes annual wellness examinations, vaccinations, internal 25and external parasite prevention treatments, testing and 26treatment of illnesses and diseases, medications, emergency   SB2461- 3 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1care and surgeries, veterinary oncology or other specialty 2care, euthanasia, and cremation. 3    Section 15. Establishment of program. The Care for Retired 4Police Dogs Program is created within the University of 5Illinois system to provide a stable funding source for the 6veterinary care of retired police dogs.  7    Section 20. Administration. The Board of Trustees of the 8University of Illinois shall contract with a not-for-profit 9corporation organized under Article 2 of the General Not For 10Profit Corporation Act of 1986 to administer and manage the 11Care for Retired Police Dogs Program. The Board of Trustees of 12the University of Illinois shall select the not-for-profit 13corporation through a competitive grant award process. The 14not-for-profit corporation must meet all of the following 15criteria:16        (1) Be dedicated to the protection or care of retired 17    police dogs.18        (2) Be exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of 19    the Internal Revenue Code as an organization described in 20    Section 501(c)(3) of that Code.21        (3) Have maintained such tax-exempt status for at 22    least 5 years.23        (4) Agree to be subject to review and audit at the 24    discretion of the Auditor General in order to ensure   SB2461- 4 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1    accurate accounting and disbursement of State funds.2        (5) Demonstrate the ability to effectively and 3    efficiently disseminate information and to assist former 4    handlers and adopters of retired police dogs in complying 5    with this Act.  6    Section 25. Funding.7    (a) Subject to appropriations made by the General Assembly 8from the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund to the University 9of Illinois for implementation of this Act, the Board of 10Trustees of the University of Illinois shall make grants to 11the not-for-profit corporation contracted by the Board of 12Trustees of the University of Illinois under Section 20 to be 13the disbursing authority for the Care for Retired Police Dogs 14Program. These funds must be disbursed to the former handler 15or the adopter of a retired police dog that served for 5 years 16or more as a police dog upon receipt of:17        (1) valid documentation from the law enforcement 18    agency or correctional agency from which the dog retired 19    that verifies that the dog was in the service of or 20    employed by that agency; and21            (A) that the dog served 5 years or more with that 22        agency;23            (B) that the dog served a total of 5 years or more 24        with 2 or more law enforcement agencies or 25        correctional agencies; or  SB2461- 5 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1            (C) that, notwithstanding the length of service 2        requirements elsewhere in this paragraph (1), the dog 3        served 3 years or more with one or more law enforcement 4        agencies or correctional agencies, was injured in the 5        line of duty while serving with a law enforcement 6        agency or correctional agency, and retired from the 7        agency the dog was serving with at the time of the 8        injury due to such injury; and9        (2) a valid invoice from a veterinarian for veterinary 10    care provided in this State to a retired police dog and 11    documentation establishing payment of the invoice by the 12    former handler or the adopter of the retired police dog.13    (b) Annual disbursements to a former handler or an adopter 14to reimburse him or her for the cost of the retired police 15dog's veterinary care may not exceed $1,500 per dog. A former 16handler or an adopter of a retired police dog may not 17accumulate unused funds from a current year for use in a future 18year.19    (c) A former handler or an adopter of a retired police dog 20who seeks reimbursement for veterinary care under this Act may 21not receive reimbursement if funds appropriated for the Care 22for Retired Police Dogs Program are depleted in the year for 23which the reimbursement is sought. 24    Section 30. Administrative expenses. The University of 25Illinois shall pay to the not-for-profit corporation   SB2461- 6 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1contracted by the Board of Trustees of the University of 2Illinois under Section 20, and the not-for-profit corporation 3may use, up to 10% of appropriated funds each fiscal year for 4the not-for-profit corporation's administrative expenses, 5including salaries and benefits.  6    Section 90. Rules. The Board of Trustees of the University 7of Illinois shall adopt rules to implement this Act. 8    Section 100. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 9changing Section 3-699.8 as follows: 10    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.8)11    Sec. 3-699.8. Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Plates.12    (a) The Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 13applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary, may 14issue special registration plates designated as Illinois 15Police K-9 Memorial license plates. The special plates issued 16under this Section shall be affixed only to passenger vehicles 17of the first division, motorcycles, autocycles, or motor 18vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 8,000 19pounds. Plates issued under this Section shall expire 20according to the multi-year procedure established by Section 213-414.1 of this Code. 22    (b) The design and color of the plates is wholly within the 23discretion of the Secretary. The Secretary may allow the   SB2461- 7 -LRB104 09953 LNS 20023 b1plates to be issued as vanity plates or personalized under 2Section 3-405.1 of the Code. Appropriate documentation, as 3determined by the Secretary, shall accompany each application. 4The Secretary shall prescribe stickers or decals as provided 5under Section 3-412 of this Code. 6    (c) An applicant shall be charged a $40 fee for original 7issuance in addition to the applicable registration fee. Of 8this additional fee, $15 shall be deposited into the Secretary 9of State Special License Plate Fund and $25 shall be deposited 10into the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund. For each 11registration renewal period, a $27 fee, in addition to the 12appropriate registration fee, shall be charged. Of this 13additional fee, $2 shall be deposited into the Secretary of 14State Special License Plate Fund and $25 shall be deposited 15into the Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund. 16    (d) The Illinois Police K-9 Memorial Fund is created as a 17special fund in the State treasury. All moneys in the Illinois 18Police K-9 Memorial Fund shall be paid, subject to 19appropriation by the General Assembly and distribution by the 20Secretary, as grants to the Northern Illinois Police K-9 21Memorial for the creation, operation, and maintenance of a 22police K-9 memorial monument and for grants under the Care for 23Retired Police Dogs Program Act. 24(Source: P.A. 103-843, eff. 1-1-25.)